Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
514C

LEASE TO
FEE CONVERSIONS FOR

CONDOMINIUMS
AND COOPERATIVE HOUSING

CORPORATIONS

Part I. Right of First Refusal

Section

514C-1 Definitions

514C-2 Right of first refusal

514C-3 Improvements

514C-4 Compliance with procedures not required
when

514C-5 Offer to other prospective purchasers;
time limit

514C-6 Powers of association of owners and cooperative

housing corporation

514C-6.5 Sales to individual lessees

514C-7 Violations; voidable sale

514C-8 Exception

Part II. Voluntary Conversions

514C-21 Definitions

514C-22 Power of association of owners to
negotiate, purchase,

and sell lessor's interest

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1999, c 241, §3(1).

Cross References

Cooperative housing corporations, see chapter 421I.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next